Illinois, session 104th, HB4674.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 522-110 and by adding Section 22-112 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-110)  (was 105 ILCS 5/27-23.7)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-338)8    Sec. 22-110. Bullying prevention.9    (a) The General Assembly finds that a safe and civil 10school environment is necessary for students to learn and 11achieve and that bullying causes physical, psychological, and 12emotional harm to students and interferes with students' 13ability to learn and participate in school activities. The 14General Assembly further finds that bullying has been linked 15to other forms of antisocial behavior, such as vandalism, 16shoplifting, skipping and dropping out of school, fighting, 17using drugs and alcohol, sexual harassment, and sexual 18violence. Because of the negative outcomes associated with 19bullying in schools, the General Assembly finds that school 20districts, charter schools, and non-public, non-sectarian 21elementary and secondary schools should educate students, 22parents, and school district, charter school, or non-public, 23non-sectarian elementary or secondary school personnel about   HB4674- 2 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1what behaviors constitute prohibited bullying.2    Bullying on the basis of actual or perceived race, color, 3religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, physical appearance, 4socioeconomic status, academic status, pregnancy, parenting 5status, homelessness, age, marital status, physical or mental 6disability, military status, sexual orientation, 7gender-related identity or expression, unfavorable discharge 8from military service, association with a person or group with 9one or more of the aforementioned actual or perceived 10characteristics, or any other distinguishing characteristic is 11prohibited in all school districts, charter schools, and 12non-public, non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools. No 13student shall be subjected to bullying:14        (1) during any school-sponsored education program or 15    activity;16        (2) while in school, on school property, on school 17    buses or other school vehicles, at designated school bus 18    stops waiting for the school bus, or at school-sponsored 19    or school-sanctioned events or activities;20        (3) through the transmission of information from a 21    school computer, a school computer network, or other 22    similar electronic school equipment; or 23        (4) through the transmission of information from a 24    computer that is accessed at a nonschool-related location, 25    activity, function, or program or from the use of 26    technology or an electronic device that is not owned,   HB4674- 3 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    leased, or used by a school district or school if the 2    bullying causes a substantial disruption to the 3    educational process or orderly operation of a school. This 4    item (4) applies only in cases in which a school 5    administrator or teacher receives a report that bullying 6    through this means has occurred and does not require a 7    district or school to staff or monitor any 8    nonschool-related activity, function, or program. 9    (a-5) Nothing in this Section is intended to infringe upon 10any right to exercise free expression or the free exercise of 11religion or religiously based views protected under the First 12Amendment to the United States Constitution or under Section 3 13of Article I of the Illinois Constitution. 14    (b) In this Section: 15    "Bullying" includes "cyber-bullying" and means any severe 16or pervasive physical or verbal act or conduct, including 17communications made in writing or electronically, directed 18toward a student or students that has or can be reasonably 19predicted to have the effect of one or more of the following:20        (1) placing the student or students in reasonable fear 21    of harm to the student's or students' person or property;22        (2) causing a substantially detrimental effect on the 23    student's or students' physical or mental health;24        (3) substantially interfering with the student's or 25    students' academic performance; or26        (4) substantially interfering with the student's or   HB4674- 4 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    students' ability to participate in or benefit from the 2    services, activities, or privileges provided by a school.3    Bullying, as defined in this subsection (b), may take 4various forms, including, without limitation, one or more of 5the following: harassment, threats, intimidation, stalking, 6physical violence, sexual harassment, sexual violence, theft, 7public humiliation, destruction of property, or retaliation 8for asserting or alleging an act of bullying. This list is 9meant to be illustrative and non-exhaustive.10    "Cyber-bullying" means bullying through the use of 11technology or any electronic communication, including, without 12limitation, any transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, 13sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in 14whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic system, 15photoelectronic system, or photooptical system, including, 16without limitation, electronic mail, Internet communications, 17instant messages, or facsimile communications. 18"Cyber-bullying" includes the creation of a webpage or weblog 19in which the creator assumes the identity of another person or 20the knowing impersonation of another person as the author of 21posted content or messages if the creation or impersonation 22creates any of the effects enumerated in the definition of 23bullying in this Section. "Cyber-bullying" also includes the 24distribution by electronic means of a communication to more 25than one person or the posting of material on an electronic 26medium that may be accessed by one or more persons if the   HB4674- 5 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1distribution or posting creates any of the effects enumerated 2in the definition of bullying in this Section. 3    "Policy on bullying" means a bullying prevention policy 4that meets the following criteria:5        (1) Includes the bullying definition provided in this 6    Section.7        (2) Includes a statement that bullying is contrary to 8    State law and the policy of the school district, charter 9    school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or 10    secondary school and is consistent with subsection (a-5) 11    of this Section.12        (3) Includes procedures for promptly reporting 13    bullying, including, but not limited to, identifying and 14    providing the school e-mail address (if applicable) and 15    school telephone number for the staff person or persons 16    responsible for receiving such reports and a procedure for 17    anonymous reporting; however, this shall not be construed 18    to permit formal disciplinary action solely on the basis 19    of an anonymous report.20        (4) Consistent with federal and State laws and rules 21    governing student privacy rights, includes procedures for 22    informing parents or guardians of all students involved in 23    the alleged incident of bullying within 24 hours after the 24    school's administration is made aware of the students' 25    involvement in the incident and discussing, as 26    appropriate, the availability of social work services,   HB4674- 6 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    counseling, school psychological services, other 2    interventions, and restorative measures. The school shall 3    make diligent efforts to notify a parent or legal 4    guardian, utilizing all contact information the school has 5    available or that can be reasonably obtained by the school 6    within the 24-hour period. 7        (5) Contains procedures for promptly investigating and 8    addressing reports of bullying, including the following:9            (A) Making all reasonable efforts to complete the 10        investigation within 10 school days after the date the 11        report of the incident of bullying was received and 12        taking into consideration additional relevant 13        information received during the course of the 14        investigation about the reported incident of bullying.15            (B) Involving appropriate school support personnel 16        and other staff persons with knowledge, experience, 17        and training on bullying prevention, as deemed 18        appropriate, in the investigation process.19            (C) Notifying the principal or school 20        administrator or his or her designee of the report of 21        the incident of bullying as soon as possible after the 22        report is received.23            (D) Consistent with federal and State laws and 24        rules governing student privacy rights, providing 25        parents and guardians of the students who are parties 26        to the investigation information about the   HB4674- 7 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1        investigation and an opportunity to meet with the 2        principal or school administrator or his or her 3        designee to discuss the investigation, the findings of 4        the investigation, and the actions taken to address 5        the reported incident of bullying.6        (6) Includes the interventions that can be taken to 7    address bullying, which may include, but are not limited 8    to, school social work services, restorative measures, 9    social-emotional skill building, counseling, school 10    psychological services, and community-based services.11        (7) Includes a statement prohibiting reprisal or 12    retaliation against any person who reports an act of 13    bullying and the consequences and appropriate remedial 14    actions for a person who engages in reprisal or 15    retaliation.16        (8) Includes consequences and appropriate remedial 17    actions for a person found to have falsely accused another 18    of bullying as a means of retaliation or as a means of 19    bullying.20        (9) Is based on the engagement of a range of school 21    stakeholders, including students and parents or guardians.22        (10) Is posted on the school district's, charter 23    school's, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or 24    secondary school's existing, publicly accessible Internet 25    website, is included in the student handbook, and, where 26    applicable, posted where other policies, rules, and   HB4674- 8 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    standards of conduct are currently posted in the school 2    and provided periodically throughout the school year to 3    students and faculty, and is distributed annually to 4    parents, guardians, students, and school personnel, 5    including new employees when hired.6        (11) As part of the process of reviewing and 7    re-evaluating the policy under subsection (d) of this 8    Section, contains a policy evaluation process to assess 9    the outcomes and effectiveness of the policy that 10    includes, but is not limited to, factors such as the 11    frequency of victimization; student, staff, and family 12    observations of safety at a school; identification of 13    areas of a school where bullying occurs; the types of 14    bullying utilized; and bystander intervention or 15    participation. The school district, charter school, or 16    non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school 17    may use relevant data and information it already collects 18    for other purposes in the policy evaluation. The 19    information developed as a result of the policy evaluation 20    must be made available on the Internet website of the 21    school district, charter school, or non-public, 22    non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. If an 23    Internet website is not available, the information must be 24    provided to school administrators, school board members, 25    school personnel, parents, guardians, and students.26        (12) Is consistent with the policies of the school   HB4674- 9 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    board, charter school, or non-public, non-sectarian 2    elementary or secondary school.3        (13) Requires all individual instances of bullying, as 4    well as all threats, suggestions, or instances of 5    self-harm determined to be the result of bullying, to be 6    reported to the parents or legal guardians of those 7    involved under the guidelines provided in paragraph (4) of 8    this definition. 9    "Restorative measures" means a continuum of school-based 10alternatives to exclusionary discipline, such as suspensions 11and expulsions, that: (i) are adapted to the particular needs 12of the school and community, (ii) contribute to maintaining 13school safety, (iii) protect the integrity of a positive and 14productive learning climate, (iv) teach students the personal 15and interpersonal skills they will need to be successful in 16school and society, (v) serve to build and restore 17relationships among students, families, schools, and 18communities, (vi) reduce the likelihood of future disruption 19by balancing accountability with an understanding of students' 20behavioral health needs in order to keep students in school, 21and (vii) increase student accountability if the incident of 22bullying is based on religion, race, ethnicity, or any other 23category that is identified in the Illinois Human Rights Act. 24    "School personnel" means persons employed by, on contract 25with, or who volunteer in a school district, charter school, 26or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school,   HB4674- 10 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1including, without limitation, school and school district 2administrators, teachers, school social workers, school 3counselors, school psychologists, school nurses, cafeteria 4workers, custodians, bus drivers, school resource officers, 5and security guards. 6    (c) (Blank). 7    (d) Each school district, charter school, and non-public, 8non-sectarian elementary or secondary school shall create, 9maintain, and implement a policy on bullying, which policy 10must be filed with the State Board of Education. The policy on 11bullying shall be based on the State Board of Education's 12template for a model bullying prevention policy under 13subsection (h) and shall include the criteria set forth in the 14definition of "policy on bullying". The policy or implementing 15procedure shall include a process to investigate whether a 16reported act of bullying is within the permissible scope of 17the district's or school's jurisdiction and shall require that 18the district or school provide the victim with information 19regarding services that are available within the district and 20community, such as counseling, support services, and other 21programs. School personnel available for help with a bully or 22to make a report about bullying shall be made known to parents 23or legal guardians, students, and school personnel. Every 2 24years, each school district, charter school, and non-public, 25non-sectarian elementary or secondary school shall conduct a 26review and re-evaluation of its policy and make any necessary   HB4674- 11 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1and appropriate revisions. No later than September 30 of the 2subject year, the policy must be filed with the State Board of 3Education after being updated. The State Board of Education 4shall monitor and provide technical support for the 5implementation of policies created under this subsection (d). 6In monitoring the implementation of the policies, the State 7Board of Education shall review each filed policy on bullying 8to ensure all policies meet the requirements set forth in this 9Section, including ensuring that each policy meets the 12 10criteria criterion identified within the definition of "policy 11on bullying" set forth in this Section. 12    If a school district, charter school, or non-public, 13non-sectarian elementary or secondary school fails to file a 14policy on bullying by September 30 of the subject year, the 15State Board of Education shall provide a written request for 16filing to the school district, charter school, or non-public, 17non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. If a school 18district, charter school, or non-public, non-sectarian 19elementary or secondary school fails to file a policy on 20bullying within 14 days of receipt of the aforementioned 21written request, the State Board of Education shall publish 22notice of the non-compliance on the State Board of Education's 23website. 24    Each school district, charter school, and non-public, 25non-sectarian elementary or secondary school may provide 26evidence-based professional development and youth programming   HB4674- 12 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1on bullying prevention that is consistent with the provisions 2of this Section. 3    (e) This Section shall not be interpreted to prevent a 4victim from seeking redress under any other available civil or 5criminal law. 6    (f) School districts, charter schools, and non-public, 7non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools shall collect, 8maintain, and submit to the State Board of Education 9non-identifiable data regarding verified allegations of 10bullying within the school district, charter school, or 11non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. 12School districts, charter schools, and non-public, 13non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools must submit 14such data in an annual report due to the State Board of 15Education no later than August 15 of each year starting with 16the 2024-2025 school year through the 2030-2031 school year. 17The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the 18submission of data that includes, but is not limited to: (i) a 19record of each verified allegation of bullying and action 20taken; and (ii) whether the instance of bullying was based on 21actual or perceived characteristics identified in subsection 22(a) and, if so, lists the relevant characteristics. The rules 23for the submission of data shall be consistent with federal 24and State laws and rules governing student privacy rights, 25including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational 26Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 and the Illinois School Student   HB4674- 13 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1Records Act, which shall include, without limitation, a record 2of each complaint and action taken. The State Board of 3Education shall adopt rules regarding the notification of 4school districts, charter schools, and non-public, 5non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools that fail to 6comply with the requirements of this subsection. 7    (g) Upon the request of a parent or legal guardian of a 8child enrolled in a school district, charter school, or 9non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school 10within this State, the State Board of Education must provide 11non-identifiable data on the number of bullying allegations 12and incidents in a given year in the school district, charter 13school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary 14school to the requesting parent or legal guardian. The State 15Board of Education shall adopt rules regarding (i) the 16handling of such data, (ii) maintaining the privacy of the 17students and families involved, and (iii) best practices for 18sharing numerical data with parents and legal guardians. 19    (h) By January 1, 2024, the State Board of Education shall 20post on its Internet website a template for a model bullying 21prevention policy.22    (i) The Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying Prevention 23Fund is created as a special fund in the State treasury. Any 24moneys appropriated to the Fund may be used, subject to 25appropriation, by the State Board of Education for the 26purposes of subsection (j).   HB4674- 14 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    (j) Subject to appropriation, the State Superintendent of 2Education may provide a grant to a school district, charter 3school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary 4school to support its anti-bullying programming. Grants may be 5awarded from the Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying 6Prevention Fund. School districts, charter schools, and 7non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary schools that 8are not in compliance with subsection (f) are not eligible to 9receive a grant from the Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying 10Prevention Fund. 11(Source: P.A. 103-47, eff. 6-9-23; 104-391, eff. 8-15-25; 12revised 9-24-25.) 13    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-338)14    Sec. 22-110. Bullying prevention.15    (a) The General Assembly finds that a safe and civil 16school environment is necessary for students to learn and 17achieve and that bullying causes physical, psychological, and 18emotional harm to students and interferes with students' 19ability to learn and participate in school activities. The 20General Assembly further finds that bullying has been linked 21to other forms of antisocial behavior, such as vandalism, 22shoplifting, skipping and dropping out of school, fighting, 23using drugs and alcohol, sexual harassment, and sexual 24violence. Because of the negative outcomes associated with 25bullying in schools, the General Assembly finds that school   HB4674- 15 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1districts, charter schools, and non-public, non-sectarian 2elementary and secondary schools should educate students, 3parents, and school district, charter school, or non-public, 4non-sectarian elementary or secondary school personnel about 5what behaviors constitute prohibited bullying.6    Bullying on the basis of actual or perceived race, color, 7religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, physical appearance, 8socioeconomic status, academic status, pregnancy, parenting 9status, homelessness, age, marital status, physical or mental 10disability, military status, sexual orientation, 11gender-related identity or expression, unfavorable discharge 12from military service, association with a person or group with 13one or more of the aforementioned actual or perceived 14characteristics, or any other distinguishing characteristic is 15prohibited in all school districts, charter schools, and 16non-public, non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools. No 17student shall be subjected to bullying:18        (1) during any school-sponsored education program or 19    activity;20        (2) while in school, on school property, on school 21    buses or other school vehicles, at designated school bus 22    stops waiting for the school bus, or at school-sponsored 23    or school-sanctioned events or activities;24        (3) through the transmission of information from a 25    school computer, a school computer network, or other 26    similar electronic school equipment; or   HB4674- 16 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1        (4) through the transmission of information from a 2    computer that is accessed at a nonschool-related location, 3    activity, function, or program or from the use of 4    technology or an electronic device that is not owned, 5    leased, or used by a school district or school if the 6    bullying causes a substantial disruption to the 7    educational process or orderly operation of a school. This 8    item (4) applies only in cases in which a school 9    administrator or teacher receives a report that bullying 10    through this means has occurred and does not require a 11    district or school to staff or monitor any 12    nonschool-related activity, function, or program. 13    (a-5) Nothing in this Section is intended to infringe upon 14any right to exercise free expression or the free exercise of 15religion or religiously based views protected under the First 16Amendment to the United States Constitution or under Section 3 17of Article I of the Illinois Constitution. 18    (b) In this Section: 19    "Artificial intelligence" has the meaning given to that 20term in the Digital Voice and Likeness Protection Act.21    "Bullying" includes "cyber-bullying" and means any severe 22or pervasive physical or verbal act or conduct, including 23communications made in writing or electronically, directed 24toward a student or students that has or can be reasonably 25predicted to have the effect of one or more of the following:26        (1) placing the student or students in reasonable fear   HB4674- 17 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    of harm to the student's or students' person or property;2        (2) causing a substantially detrimental effect on the 3    student's or students' physical or mental health;4        (3) substantially interfering with the student's or 5    students' academic performance; or6        (4) substantially interfering with the student's or 7    students' ability to participate in or benefit from the 8    services, activities, or privileges provided by a school.9    Bullying, as defined in this subsection (b), may take 10various forms, including, without limitation, one or more of 11the following: harassment, threats, intimidation, stalking, 12physical violence, sexual harassment, sexual violence, posting 13or distributing sexually explicit images, theft, public 14humiliation, destruction of property, or retaliation for 15asserting or alleging an act of bullying. This list is meant to 16be illustrative and non-exhaustive.17    "Cyber-bullying" means bullying through the use of 18technology or any electronic communication, including, without 19limitation, any transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, 20sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in 21whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic system, 22photoelectronic system, or photooptical system, including, 23without limitation, electronic mail, Internet communications, 24instant messages, or facsimile communications. 25"Cyber-bullying" includes the creation of a webpage or weblog 26in which the creator assumes the identity of another person or   HB4674- 18 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1the knowing impersonation of another person as the author of 2posted content or messages if the creation or impersonation 3creates any of the effects enumerated in the definition of 4bullying in this Section. "Cyber-bullying" also includes the 5distribution by electronic means of a communication to more 6than one person or the posting of material on an electronic 7medium that may be accessed by one or more persons if the 8distribution or posting creates any of the effects enumerated 9in the definition of bullying in this Section. Beginning with 10the 2026-2027 school year, "cyber-bullying" also includes the 11posting or distribution of an unauthorized digital replica by 12electronic means if the posting or distribution creates any of 13the effects enumerated in the definition of "bullying" in this 14Section. 15    "Digital replica" has the meaning given to that term in 16the Digital Voice and Likeness Protection Act.17    "Policy on bullying" means a bullying prevention policy 18that meets the following criteria:19        (1) Includes the bullying definition provided in this 20    Section.21        (2) Includes a statement that bullying is contrary to 22    State law and the policy of the school district, charter 23    school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or 24    secondary school and is consistent with subsection (a-5) 25    of this Section.26        (3) Includes procedures for promptly reporting   HB4674- 19 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    bullying, including, but not limited to, identifying and 2    providing the school e-mail address (if applicable) and 3    school telephone number for the staff person or persons 4    responsible for receiving such reports and a procedure for 5    anonymous reporting; however, this shall not be construed 6    to permit formal disciplinary action solely on the basis 7    of an anonymous report.8        (4) Consistent with federal and State laws and rules 9    governing student privacy rights, includes procedures for 10    informing parents or guardians of all students involved in 11    the alleged incident of bullying within 24 hours after the 12    school's administration is made aware of the students' 13    involvement in the incident and discussing, as 14    appropriate, the availability of social work services, 15    counseling, school psychological services, other 16    interventions, and restorative measures. The school shall 17    make diligent efforts to notify a parent or legal 18    guardian, utilizing all contact information the school has 19    available or that can be reasonably obtained by the school 20    within the 24-hour period. 21        (5) Contains procedures for promptly investigating and 22    addressing reports of bullying, including the following:23            (A) Making all reasonable efforts to complete the 24        investigation within 10 school days after the date the 25        report of the incident of bullying was received and 26        taking into consideration additional relevant   HB4674- 20 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1        information received during the course of the 2        investigation about the reported incident of bullying.3            (B) Involving appropriate school support personnel 4        and other staff persons with knowledge, experience, 5        and training on bullying prevention, as deemed 6        appropriate, in the investigation process.7            (C) Notifying the principal or school 8        administrator or his or her designee of the report of 9        the incident of bullying as soon as possible after the 10        report is received.11            (D) Consistent with federal and State laws and 12        rules governing student privacy rights, providing 13        parents and guardians of the students who are parties 14        to the investigation information about the 15        investigation and an opportunity to meet with the 16        principal or school administrator or his or her 17        designee to discuss the investigation, the findings of 18        the investigation, and the actions taken to address 19        the reported incident of bullying.20        (6) Includes the interventions that can be taken to 21    address bullying, which may include, but are not limited 22    to, school social work services, restorative measures, 23    social-emotional skill building, counseling, school 24    psychological services, and community-based services.25        (6.5) Establishes escalating interventions for 26    students who engage in known, pervasive, and persistent   HB4674- 21 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    bullying. 2        (7) Includes a statement prohibiting reprisal or 3    retaliation against any person who reports an act of 4    bullying and the consequences and appropriate remedial 5    actions for a person who engages in reprisal or 6    retaliation.7        (8) Includes consequences and appropriate remedial 8    actions for a person found to have falsely accused another 9    of bullying as a means of retaliation or as a means of 10    bullying.11        (9) Is based on the engagement of a range of school 12    stakeholders, including students and parents or guardians.13        (10) Is posted on the school district's, charter 14    school's, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or 15    secondary school's existing, publicly accessible Internet 16    website, is included in the student handbook, and, where 17    applicable, posted where other policies, rules, and 18    standards of conduct are currently posted in the school 19    and provided periodically throughout the school year to 20    students and faculty, and is distributed annually to 21    parents, guardians, students, and school personnel, 22    including new employees when hired.23        (11) As part of the process of reviewing and 24    re-evaluating the policy under subsection (d) of this 25    Section, contains a policy evaluation process to assess 26    the outcomes and effectiveness of the policy that   HB4674- 22 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    includes, but is not limited to, factors such as the 2    frequency of victimization; student, staff, and family 3    observations of safety at a school; identification of 4    areas of a school where bullying occurs; the types of 5    bullying utilized; and bystander intervention or 6    participation. The school district, charter school, or 7    non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school 8    may use relevant data and information it already collects 9    for other purposes in the policy evaluation. The 10    information developed as a result of the policy evaluation 11    must be made available on the Internet website of the 12    school district, charter school, or non-public, 13    non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. If an 14    Internet website is not available, the information must be 15    provided to school administrators, school board members, 16    school personnel, parents, guardians, and students.17        (12) Is consistent with the policies of the school 18    board, charter school, or non-public, non-sectarian 19    elementary or secondary school.20        (13) Requires all individual instances of bullying, as 21    well as all threats, suggestions, or instances of 22    self-harm determined to be the result of bullying, to be 23    reported to the parents or legal guardians of those 24    involved under the guidelines provided in paragraph (4) of 25    this definition. 26    "Restorative measures" means a continuum of school-based   HB4674- 23 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1alternatives to exclusionary discipline, such as suspensions 2and expulsions, that: (i) are adapted to the particular needs 3of the school and community, (ii) contribute to maintaining 4school safety, (iii) protect the integrity of a positive and 5productive learning climate, (iv) teach students the personal 6and interpersonal skills they will need to be successful in 7school and society, (v) serve to build and restore 8relationships among students, families, schools, and 9communities, (vi) reduce the likelihood of future disruption 10by balancing accountability with an understanding of students' 11behavioral health needs in order to keep students in school, 12and (vii) increase student accountability if the incident of 13bullying is based on religion, race, ethnicity, or any other 14category that is identified in the Illinois Human Rights Act. 15    "School personnel" means persons employed by, on contract 16with, or who volunteer in a school district, charter school, 17or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school, 18including, without limitation, school and school district 19administrators, teachers, school social workers, school 20counselors, school psychologists, school nurses, cafeteria 21workers, custodians, bus drivers, school resource officers, 22and security guards. 23    "Unauthorized digital replica" means the use of a digital 24replica of an individual without the consent of the depicted 25individual. 26    (c) (Blank).   HB4674- 24 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    (d) Each school district, charter school, and non-public, 2non-sectarian elementary or secondary school shall create, 3maintain, and implement a policy on bullying, which policy 4must be filed with the State Board of Education. The policy on 5bullying shall be based on the State Board of Education's 6template for a model bullying prevention policy under 7subsection (h) and shall include the criteria set forth in the 8definition of "policy on bullying". The policy or implementing 9procedure shall include a process to investigate whether a 10reported act of bullying is within the permissible scope of 11the district's or school's jurisdiction and shall require that 12the district or school provide the victim with information 13regarding services that are available within the district and 14community, such as counseling, support services, and other 15programs. School personnel available for help with a bully or 16to make a report about bullying shall be made known to parents 17or legal guardians, students, and school personnel. Every 2 18years, each school district, charter school, and non-public, 19non-sectarian elementary or secondary school shall conduct a 20review and re-evaluation of its policy and make any necessary 21and appropriate revisions. No later than September 30 of the 22subject year, the policy must be filed with the State Board of 23Education after being updated. The State Board of Education 24shall monitor and provide technical support for the 25implementation of policies created under this subsection (d). 26In monitoring the implementation of the policies, the State   HB4674- 25 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1Board of Education shall review each filed policy on bullying 2to ensure all policies meet the requirements set forth in this 3Section, including ensuring that each policy meets the 13 4criteria criterion identified within the definition of "policy 5on bullying" set forth in this Section. 6    If a school district, charter school, or non-public, 7non-sectarian elementary or secondary school fails to file a 8policy on bullying by September 30 of the subject year, the 9State Board of Education shall provide a written request for 10filing to the school district, charter school, or non-public, 11non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. If a school 12district, charter school, or non-public, non-sectarian 13elementary or secondary school fails to file a policy on 14bullying within 14 days of receipt of the aforementioned 15written request, the State Board of Education shall publish 16notice of the non-compliance on the State Board of Education's 17website. 18    Each school district, charter school, and non-public, 19non-sectarian elementary or secondary school may provide 20evidence-based professional development and youth programming 21on bullying prevention that is consistent with the provisions 22of this Section. 23    (e) This Section shall not be interpreted to prevent a 24victim from seeking redress under any other available civil or 25criminal law. 26    (f) School districts, charter schools, and non-public,   HB4674- 26 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools shall collect, 2maintain, and submit to the State Board of Education 3non-identifiable data regarding verified allegations of 4bullying within the school district, charter school, or 5non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. 6School districts, charter schools, and non-public, 7non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools must submit 8such data in an annual report due to the State Board of 9Education no later than August 15 of each year starting with 10the 2024-2025 school year through the 2030-2031 school year. 11The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the 12submission of data that includes, but is not limited to: (i) a 13record of each verified allegation of bullying and action 14taken; and (ii) whether the instance of bullying was based on 15actual or perceived characteristics identified in subsection 16(a) and, if so, lists the relevant characteristics. The rules 17for the submission of data shall be consistent with federal 18and State laws and rules governing student privacy rights, 19including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational 20Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 and the Illinois School Student 21Records Act, which shall include, without limitation, a record 22of each complaint and action taken. The State Board of 23Education shall adopt rules regarding the notification of 24school districts, charter schools, and non-public, 25non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools that fail to 26comply with the requirements of this subsection.   HB4674- 27 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    (g) Upon the request of a parent or legal guardian of a 2child enrolled in a school district, charter school, or 3non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school 4within this State, the State Board of Education must provide 5non-identifiable data on the number of bullying allegations 6and incidents in a given year in the school district, charter 7school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary 8school to the requesting parent or legal guardian. The State 9Board of Education shall adopt rules regarding (i) the 10handling of such data, (ii) maintaining the privacy of the 11students and families involved, and (iii) best practices for 12sharing numerical data with parents and legal guardians. 13    (h) By January 1, 2024, the State Board of Education shall 14post on its Internet website a template for a model bullying 15prevention policy.16    (i) The Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying Prevention 17Fund is created as a special fund in the State treasury. Any 18moneys appropriated to the Fund may be used, subject to 19appropriation, by the State Board of Education for the 20purposes of subsection (j). 21    (j) Subject to appropriation, the State Superintendent of 22Education may provide a grant to a school district, charter 23school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary 24school to support its anti-bullying programming. Grants may be 25awarded from the Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying 26Prevention Fund. School districts, charter schools, and   HB4674- 28 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary schools that 2are not in compliance with subsection (f) are not eligible to 3receive a grant from the Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying 4Prevention Fund. 5(Source: P.A. 103-47, eff. 6-9-23; 104-338, eff. 7-1-26; 6104-391, eff. 8-15-25; revised 9-24-25.) 7    (105 ILCS 5/22-112 new)8    Sec. 22-112. Student suicide investigation and 9accountability.10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Bullying" has the meaning given to that term in Section 1222-110.13    "Educational environment" includes school property, 14school-sponsored activities, school transportation, and 15electronic or online activity that substantially interferes 16with a student's educational experience.17    "Harassment" means any unwelcome conduct, whether verbal, 18physical, electronic, or written, that is based on a student's 19actual or perceived race, color, religion, national origin, 20ancestry, age, sex, marital status, order of protection 21status, disability, military status, sexual orientation, 22pregnancy, or unfavorable discharge from military service and 23that has the purpose or effect of substantially interfering 24with a student's educational performance or creating an 25intimidating, hostile, or offensive educational environment.  HB4674- 29 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1    (b) In the event of the death by suicide of a student 2enrolled in a school district, the school district shall 3initiate a complete and transparent investigation to determine 4whether bullying or harassment related to the educational 5environment played a contributing role. The investigation 6shall be initiated no later than 10 school days after the 7school district becomes aware of the death.8    (c) The investigation shall include, but is not limited 9to:10        (1) a review of bullying, harassment, discipline, 11    attendance, counseling, and incident records concerning 12    the student;13        (2) interviews with relevant administrators, teachers, 14    counselors, staff, and, if appropriate, students;15        (3) a review of complaints or reports made by the 16    student or the student's parent or guardian;17        (4) an assessment of the school district's compliance 18    with its policy on bullying under Section 22-110; and19        (5) identification of any failures to intervene or 20    enforce existing policies.21    Employees of the school district shall fully cooperate 22with the investigation.23    Relevant records shall be preserved and may not be 24destroyed, altered, or withheld during the investigation.25    (d) Upon completion of an investigation under subsection 26(b), the school district shall prepare a written investigative   HB4674- 30 -LRB104 17817 LNS 31250 b1report summarizing its findings, conclusions, and recommended 2corrective actions. The report shall be provided to:3        (1) the deceased student's parent or guardian, subject 4    to applicable privacy laws; and5        (2) the State Board of Education.6    A redacted version of the report, removing personally 7identifiable student information, shall be made available to 8the public upon request.9    The State Board of Education may review the report for 10compliance with this Section and may require a corrective 11action plan or an additional review if deficiencies are 12identified. 13    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 14changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 15that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 16represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 17not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 18made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 19Public Act.